Hawaii statutes.
[§846-10.6] Criminal history record
improvement revolving fund; established. There is established a criminal
history record improvement revolving fund. All proceeds accumulated by the
Hawaii criminal justice data center or any state or county criminal justice
agency through the assessment of fees for services as provided in section
846-10.5 related to criminal history record information from the state system
shall be deposited into this revolving fund. Moneys in the revolving fund
shall be expended by the Hawaii criminal justice data center and used to
improve the criminal history record information system established under this
chapter. [L Sp 1995, c 7, §2]

Note

Transfer of certain interest earnings to general fund until
June 30, 2015. L 2009, c 79, §30(a)(42).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next